Hawaii statutes.
§508D-3.5 Disclosure of
documents; required documentation. (a) If the residential real property
being offered for sale is subject to a recorded declaration, the seller shall
provide the following documents and any amendments or supplements thereto, to the
extent applicable:

(1) Articles of incorporation or other document, if
any, creating the corporation or association whereby the corporation or
association has the power to enforce the declaration;

(2) Bylaws of the corporation or association;

(3) Declaration or similar organizational documents,
and any exhibits thereto; and

(4) Any rules relating to the use of common areas,
architectural control, maintenance of units, or payment of money as a regular
assessment or otherwise in connection with the provisions, maintenance, or
service for the benefit of the residential real property or other real property
or common areas.

(b) If the residential real property is
otherwise subject to restrictions or conditions on use, either because of
covenants contained in the deed for the property or because of another recorded
document, the disclosure shall also include all documentation relating to any
restrictions or conditions, including but not limited to any unrecorded rules
or guidelines that may have been issued by any entity responsible for enforcing
those restrictions or guidelines in a manner consistent with and subject to the
seller's duty of good faith as provided for under section 508D-9.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision in
this chapter to the contrary, the seller shall not be required to provide the
documentation required under subsection (a) until ten calendar days after the
seller and buyer have received a current title report for the property offered
for sale. Upon receipt of the required documentation, the buyer shall have
fifteen calendar days to examine the documents and decide whether to rescind
the real estate purchase contract. If the buyer decides to rescind the real
estate purchase contract, the buyer shall deliver to the seller within the
fifteen-day period written notification of the buyer's decision to rescind the
real estate purchase contract. Failure to deliver the written notification to
the seller within the fifteen-day period shall be deemed an acceptance of the
property offered for sale with the conditions, covenants, or restrictions on
use set forth in the documents.

The right of rescission set forth in this
subsection shall be in addition to the rights of rescission set forth in
sections 508D-5, 508D-6, and 508D-13.

The seller and the buyer may agree in writing
to reduce or extend the time periods and deadlines set forth in this
subsection.

(d) If the required documents under this
section are available electronically on the Internet, the seller, in lieu of
providing hard copies of the documents and with the buyer's consent, may
provide a written statement to the buyer that directs the buyer to the internet
address or addresses where the documents are located.

(e) Compliance with this section shall fulfill
the seller's duty of disclosure of material facts relating to a recorded
declaration or other recorded restrictions or conditions on use of the property
being offered for sale. [L 2013, c 186, §2; am L 2015, c 135, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next